src/fst/incoming/Blackfoot_weighted.lexc
LEXICON NA
@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@R.pos.NOUN@0  NA_0_IM "weight: 6.40352" ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NA+Der/Verb+VAI:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VAI_SUFFIXES "weight: 8.80215" ;

! LEXICON NA_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NA:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI@R.class.VERB@:0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NA:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI@R.class.VERB@:0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NA_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@+NA:@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@  NA_0_IM "weight: 6.40352" ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NA+Der/Verb+VAI:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VAI_SUFFIXES "weight: 8.80215" ;

! LEXICON NA_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NA:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NA_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NA:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI
@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@R.pos.NOUN@0  NI_0_IM "weight: 7.54048" ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NI+Der/Verb+VII:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VII_SUFFIXES "weight: 11.2581" ;

! LEXICON NI_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NI:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+NI@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NI:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NI_IM
@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@+NI:@P.im.IM@@R.pos.NOUN@0  NI_0_IM "weight: 7.54048" ;
@R.pos.VERBALIZE@+NI+Der/Verb+VII:@R.pos.VERBALIZE@0 NOUN_VII_SUFFIXES "weight: 11.2581" ;

! LEXICON NI_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

! LEXICON NI_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NI:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;
! @R.class.VERB@+VII@R.class.VERB@:0 VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON NAD
+NAD:0  NA_0_IM  ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NAD:@P.number.SG@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NAD:@P.number.PL@  NA_0_IM ;

!LEXICON NAD_IM
!@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

! LEXICON NAD_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NAD:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NA_0_IM ;

LEXICON NID
+NID:0  NI_POSS_NUM "weight: 1.13695" ;

! LEXICON NID_SG
! @P.number.SG@+NID:@P.number.SG@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL
! @P.number.PL@+NID:@P.number.PL@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

!LEXICON NID_IM
!@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_SG_IM
! @P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.SG@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! LEXICON NID_PL_IM
! @P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@+NID:@P.number.PL@@P.im.IM@  NI_POSS_NUM ;

! Below is the combinatorial PARADIGM for the possessive circumfixes

! POSS+stem+POSS+NUM
! POSS+stem+POSS+OBV
! stem+NUM
! stem+OBV

LEXICON VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES
+Der/Nom:0                     NOUN_DER "weight: 0.741105" ;
+Der/Nom2:%>n                  NOUN_DER "weight: 1.66295" ;
+Der/Nom3:%>i2hsin             NOUN_DER "weight: 13.9214" ;
+Der/Nom4:%>hp                 NOUN_DER "weight: 3.81952" ;
+Der/Nom5:%>o'p                NOUN_DER "weight: 4.25249" ;

LEXICON NOUN_DER
+NA:0 NA_0_IM "weight: 2.27391" ;
+NI:0 NI_0_IM "weight: 1.13695" ;

LEXICON NA_0_IM
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@%>im NA_POSS "weight: 6.40352" ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                              NA_POSS ;
@R.person.NULL@                                       NA_POSS ;

LEXICON NI_0_IM
@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@:@D.person.NULL@@R.im.IM@%>im NI_POSS_NUM "weight: 6.40352" ;
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@                              NI_POSS_NUM ;
@R.person.NULL@                                       NI_POSS_NUM ;

LEXICON NA_POSS
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 7.88115" ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 8.10458" ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 9.61093" ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@      NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 6.40352" ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 20.2956" ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 12.4886" ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 20.5661" ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES "weight: 21.8654" ;

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_OBV_SUFFIXES
! Singular
@D.number.PL@ NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG ;
! Obviative
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>yi # "weight: 21.7982" ; ! Optional obviative with non-possessed form
@D.person.NULL@@U.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@U.person.OT@%>yi # "weight: 21.7982" ; ! Obligatory obviative with 3rd person possessor
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@%>yi # "weight: 21.7982" ; ! Optional obviative with non-3rd possessor
! Plural
@D.number.SG@@D.person.OT@+Pl:@D.number.SG@@D.person.OT@%>iksi # "weight: 18.2191" ; ! Optional plural for non-3rd possessor and non-possessed
! Non-Referring
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # "weight: 4.89252" ; ! Optional non-referring suffix, number unrestricted

LEXICON NA_NUMBER_SUFFIXES_SG
@D.person.OT@@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.person.OT@@D.number.PL@%>wa # "weight: 19.522" ; ! Optional singular for non-3rd person possessed, non-plural only

LEXICON NI_POSS_NUM
! Singular possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@U.person.NI@0 NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 7.88115" ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@U.person.KI@0 NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 8.10458" ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@U.person.OT@0   NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 9.61093" ;
@U.person.NULL@:@U.person.NULL@                NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 6.40352" ;
! Plural possessors
@U.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@U.person.NI@%>innaan  NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 20.2956" ;
@U.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@U.person.KI@%>innoon NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 12.4886" ;
@U.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@U.person.KI@%>oaawa  NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 20.5661" ;
@U.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@U.person.OT@%>oaawa   NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES "weight: 21.8654" ;

LEXICON NI_NUMBER_SUFFIXES
@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.number.PL@%>yi # "weight: 12.5123" ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>istsi # "weight: 20.0108" ;
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # "weight: 4.89252" ;


! The following lexicon contains the enclitic pronouns or attached pronouns from Frantz 2017 Chapter 9
! Using the term D3Sg follows Frantz in distinguishing between the 3rd person pronoun used when there
! is only one argument (Distinct third person singular), and just the regular 3rd person pronoun.
! They are not marked as subject or object because they can be either.


! End Code

! I am going to include the concrete verb finals (see Frantz 2017 chapter 18.)
! The reason being that this is the best place to control them considering the four verb classes
! The relfexive changes VTA verbs into VAI verbs and takes VAI suffixes. The same is true of the reciprocal. 
! The benfactive changes Intransitive to Transitive verbs.

LEXICON VAI
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VAI:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES "weight: 6.79616" ;
!@R.class.NI@+NI+Der/Verb+VAI:@R.class.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VAI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VII
!@R.class.NA@+NA+Der/Verb+VII:@R.class.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VII:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES "weight: 8.11512" ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VII_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTI
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VTI:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES "weight: 7.6279" ;
!@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+NI+Der/Verb+VTI:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTA
@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@+VTA:@R.pos.NOMINALIZE@0    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES "weight: 7.77294" ;
!@R.pos.NI@+NI+Der/Verb+VTA:@R.pos.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTA_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON INDEP_NA_STEMS
stamika:%^SPstamik	NA_IM "weight: 21.6877" ;
sikohkiaayowa:%^SPsikohkiaayo	NA "weight: 28.8023" ;
poosa:hpoos	NA_IM "weight: 19.4892" ;
ponokáwa:innoka NA_IM "weight: 14.7687" ;
ponokáómitaawa:innokáómitaa NA_IM "weight: 15.1333" ;
pí'kihtaana:pí'kihtaan	NA "weight: 25.0026" ;
óóhkotoka:óóhkotok	NA_IM "weight: 21.4599" ;
otahkoiimiwa:otahkoiimi	NA "weight: 15.6442" ;
ohkiimaana:ohkiimaan	NA "weight: 21.1377" ;
miaawaahpitsiiwa:miaawaahpitsii	NA "weight: 33.6963" ;
máakááhkima'tsisa:máakááhkima'tsis	NA "weight: 28.0458" ;
ksaahkoma:ksaahkomm	NA "weight: 28.5644" ;
kiááyowa:hkiááyo	NA_IM "weight: 15.49" ;
iihtsipáítapiiyo'pa:iihtsipáítapiiyo'p	NA "weight: 35.8055" ;
imitááwa:i3mitáá	NA_IM "weight: 7.03605" ;
imitaikoana:i3mitaikoan	NA_IM "weight: 16.155" ;
ikohkiaapittaa'tsisa:ikohkiaapittaa'tsis	NA "weight: 65.1079" ;
iiníwa:iiníí	NA_IM "weight: 5.97744" ;
iihtáíssáakio'pa:i3htáíssáakio'p	NA "weight: 26.793" ;
áókakihtsimaawa:áókakihtsimaa	NA "weight: 21.4634" ;
áwatoyiwa:áwatoyi	NA "weight: 24.2607" ;
áótahkááokayisa:áótahkááokayis NA_IM "weight: 26.572" ;
aiksisstoomatapisttsipatakkayayiwa:aiksisstoomatapisttsipatakkayayi	NA "weight: 69.4955" ;
aiksiniwa:aiksini NA_IM "weight: 17.3045" ;
LEXICON INDEP_NI_STEMS
sáíkimao'tonipsstaani:sáíkimao'tonipsstaan	NI "weight: 43.6411" ;
pitsííksiináóowahsini:pitsííksiináóowahsin	NI "weight: 55.2556" ;
páyooyi:hpáyoo	NI_IM "weight: 8.48296" ;
ó'kapayini:ó'kapayin	NI "weight: 27.4106" ;
owahsini:owahsin	NI "weight: 22.2401" ;
ni'tsikópottoyi:ni'tsikópotto	NI "weight: 38.5594" ;
mo'tsísi:%^SPmo'tsís	NI "weight: 22.1717" ;
máakohkima'tsisi:máakohkimma'tsis	NI "weight: 40.3903" ;
kominokoyi:hkominoko	NI "weight: 21.6675" ; ! 
itsikini:itsikin	NI "weight: 24.8203" ;
issáana'kima'tsisi:i2ssáana'kima'tsis	NI "weight: 26.7503" ;
iitáísátsaakio'pi:iitáísátsaakio'p	NI "weight: 31.2928" ;
i'ksisáka'piyi:i3'ksisáka'pi	NI "weight: 38.2027" ;
astotoohsini:astotoohsin	NI "weight: 38.4258" ;
aapíínima'tsisi:%^SPa3píínima'tsis	NI "weight: 27.6666" ;
LEXICON VAI_STEMS
ikahkainnimaa:i2kahkainnimaa	VAI "weight: 28.9514" ;
iksistohsoyi:i2ksistohsoyi	VAI "weight: 37.0395" ;
ipi'ka'pssi:i2pi'ka'pssi	VAI "weight: 33.1789" ;
istta'tsi:i2stta'tsi	VAI "weight: 21.5777" ;
niitsowá'pssi:niitsowá'pssi	VAI "weight: 25.7668" ;
ohpi'si:ohpi'si	VAI "weight: 22.2708" ;
omsspika'pssi:omsspika'pssi	VAI "weight: 39.2563" ;
saipokomsstsimaa:saipokomsstsimaa	VAI "weight: 40.564" ;
sopowatsistotoohsi:sopowatsistotoohsi	VAI "weight: 43.3047" ;
waahso:waahso	VAI "weight: 14.481" ;
wayami'tsim:wayami'tsim	VAI "weight: 28.8489" ;
ikaisínaaki:i2kaisínaaki	VAI "weight: 32.9222" ;
waoo'tokiaaki:waoo'tokiaaki	VAI "weight: 30.2099" ;
LEXICON VII_STEMS
i'ksskii:i'ksskii	VII "weight: 30.4083" ;
iiso:iiso	VII "weight: 13.5647" ;
ikkaniksoohpi'yi:i2kkaniksoohpi'yi	VII "weight: 45.9842" ;
iksikka'pii:iksikka'pii	VII "weight: 37.7327" ;
ipahksimo:i2pahksimo	VII "weight: 27.0161" ;
isinata'pii:i2sinata'pii	VII "weight: 32.8332" ;
iyoomokihtsi:iyoomokihtsi	VII "weight: 21.2555" ;
o'kakóyi:o'kakóyi	VII "weight: 23.914" ;
ohpokohtssi:ohpokohtssi	VII "weight: 23.2517" ;
pi'ka'pii:pi'ka'pii	VII "weight: 24.638" ;
sikkotsi:sikkotsi	VII "weight: 21.5934" ;
sstsííwa'si:sstsííwa'si	VII "weight: 31.0415" ;
waatsistoihtsii:waatsistoihtsii	VII "weight: 43.2262" ;
LEXICON VTI_STEMS
ihkihsi:ihkihsi	VTI "weight: 15.8673" ;
ikawohpattsii:i2kawohpattsii	VTI "weight: 23.4216" ;
iksikká'pistotsi:iksikká'pistotsi	VTI "weight: 28.8079" ;
inai'tsi:inai'tsi	VTI "weight: 15.1742" ;
ipáóotskihtsi:i2páóotskihtsi	VTI "weight: 27.659" ;
ippotsipi:i2ppotsipi	VTI "weight: 26.7562" ;
ma'tsi:ma'tsi	VTI "weight: 15.1742" ;
omai'tsi:omai'tsi	VTI "weight: 15.1742" ;
oy'ssatoo:oy'ssatoo	VTI "weight: 29.1826" ;
sisiksino'tsi:sisiksino'tsi	VTI "weight: 27.0902" ;
stsiyi'tsi:stsiyi'tsi	VTI "weight: 35.5171" ;
yáakai'piksi:yáakai'piksi	VTI "weight: 30.7696" ;
LEXICON VTA_STEMS
iiyikssko:i2iyikssko	VTA "weight: 35.833" ;
ikohtoma't:i2kohtoma't	VTA "weight: 14.3632" ;
inikkihka'sat:i2nikkihka'sat	VTA "weight: 35.0119" ;
ipisttotskohto:i2pisttotskohto	VTA "weight: 37.7327" ;
istawat:i2stawat	VTA "weight: 21.7853" ;
niitsí'to:niitsí'to	VTA "weight: 31.7346" ;
ohsoto'kino:ohsoto'kino	VTA "weight: 26.4616" ;
ommo:ommo	VTA "weight: 5.97744" ;
otawanss:otawanss	VTA "weight: 14.481" ;
sapohtomo:sapohtomo	VTA "weight: 21.2979" ;
ssksimat:ssksimat	VTA "weight: 23.3088" ;
wai'pohto:wai'pohto	VTA "weight: 22.1531" ;
